Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.015

Order to require judgment debtor to answer interrogatories.

At any time within ten years after entry of a judgment for a sum of twenty-five dollars or over, unless the time is extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3), upon application by the judgment creditor such court or judge may, by order served on the judgment debtor, require such debtor to answer written interrogatories, under oath, in such form as may be approved by the court. No such creditor shall be required to proceed under this section nor shall he or she waive his or her rights to proceed under RCW 6.32.010 by proceeding under this section.

[ 1994 c 189 s 5; 1980 c 105 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 211 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—1980 c 105: See note following RCW 4.16.020.